Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6107.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. A person who that solicits, offers, or receives a kickback or bribe in connection with the furnishing of goods or services for which payment is or may be made in whole or in part pursuant to under a program established under Act No. 280 of the Public Acts of 1939, as amended, who the social welfare act, 280 PA 1939, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, makes or receives the payment, or who receives a rebate of a fee or charge for referring an individual to another person for the furnishing of the goods and services is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, or by a fine of not more than $30,000.00, or both. Model arrangements and model patient incentives, as authorized and sponsored by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, do not constitute a kickback or bribe under this section.